Utah statutes.
19-1-504.   Recordkeeping.

(1)  A manufacturer or packager of engine coolant that sells the engine coolant to a person in this state shall maintain for at least three years a record of the following for a bittering agent used in the engine coolant in accordance with Section 19-1-503:

(a)  the trade name;

(b)  the scientific name; and

(c)  the active ingredients.

(2)  A manufacturer or packager shall make the information described in Subsection (1) available to the public upon request.

